Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Regulation of Electrical Installations by Licensing Board

§ 891.
Rules adopted by Board.

The Electricians’ Licensing Board created under section 901 of this title may adopt, amend, revise, and repeal rules providing reasonable standards and requirements applicable to any electrical installation as defined in section 881 of this title, except as provided in sections 882 and 892 of this title.
The Board, if it finds it practicable to do so, may adopt the provisions of a nationally recognized electrical code under authority of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 892.
Work in progress.

Rules adopted under section 891 of this title are not applicable to the construction, repair, or replacement of any electrical installation if the work is commenced within 30 days following their adoption, or to electrical installations in any structure standing or in the process of construction at the time of their adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

, § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 893.
Commencement of work; fees; work notice; inspection of work; certificate of completion.

Electrical work in a complex structure shall not commence until a work notice accompanied by the required fee is submitted to the Department and the work notice is validated by the Department. There shall be a base fee of $40.00 for each work notice, except for electrical work done in one and two family residential dwellings. In addition to the base fee, the following fees shall be charged:

Services

Temporary—$30.00.

Permanent—1 phase and 3 phase through 400 amp—$35.00.

Permanent—401 to 800 amp—$50.00.

Permanent—801 amp and larger—$100.00.

Transformers

1 to 25 KVA—$10.00 each.

26 to 75 KVA—$15.00 each.

76 to 200 KVA—$25.00 each.

Over 200 KVA—$35.00 each.

Motors and Generators

Up to 5 hp, KW, KVA—$10.00 each.

5 to 25 hp, KW, KVA—$10.00 each.

25 to 100 hp, KW, KVA—$15.00 each.

Over 100 hp, KW, KVA—$25.00 each.

Other electrical work

Each panel and feeder after the main disconnect—$35.00.

Outlets for receptacles, switches, fixtures, electric baseboard (per 50 units or portion thereof)—$20.00.

Yard lights signs—$5.00 each.

Fuel oil, kerosene, LP, natural gas, and gasoline pumps—$15.00 each.

Boilers, furnaces, and other stationary appliances—$10.00 each.

Elevators—$75.00 each.

Platform lifts—$40.00 each.

Fire alarm initiating, signaling, and associated devices (per 50 units or portions thereof)—$30.00.

Fire alarm main panel and annunciator panels—$50.00 each.

Fire pumps—$50.00.

Reinspection fee. For each reinspection for code violations, there will be a fee of $125.00.

The Commissioner may establish inspection priorities for electrical inspections. Priorities shall be based on the relative risks to persons and property, the type and size of the complex structure, and the type and number of electrical installations to be installed. Electrical installations regulated by the Board shall be inspected by the Commissioner or an electrical inspector in accordance with the procedures and priorities established by the Commissioner.

An electrical installation in any part of a complex structure shall not be covered unless it is inspected by an electrical inspector. The provisions of this subsection may be specifically waived by an electrical inspector in writing. Upon completion of a new electrical installation, the applicant shall request a final inspection by an electrical inspector in writing. Within five working days of receipt of the application, the Commissioner, or inspector, shall conduct an inspection, establish a reasonable date for inspection, or issue a waiver of inspection.

A certificate of completion shall be issued if the Commissioner or electrical inspector determines after inspection that the installation is in compliance with the standards and requirements adopted by the Board.

No part of a complex structure, in which part a new electrical installation has been made, shall be sold or conveyed for use or occupancy without first securing a certificate of completion for the new electrical installation.

The Commissioner or an inspector designated by the Commissioner shall have authority to enter any premises in which an electrical installation subject to the rules of the Board is being or has been installed, replaced, or repaired for the purpose of making such inspection as is necessary to carry out his or her responsibilities under this subchapter. If the owner or occupant of the premises refuses to permit entry by the Commissioner, or an electrical inspector, any Superior Court, on application of the Commissioner, shall have jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing such right of entry.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1973, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 11, 1974;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1983, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 11, 1984;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1991, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 49

, § 141;

2001, No. 65

, § 2;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 29, 2010.

§ 894.
Energizing installations.

A new electrical installation in or on a complex structure or an electrical installation used for the testing or construction of a complex structure shall not be connected or caused to be connected, to a source of electrical energy unless prior to such connection, either a temporary or a permanent energizing permit is issued for that installation by the Commissioner or an electrical inspector.

This section shall not be construed to limit or interfere with a contractor’s right to receive payment for electrical work for which a certificate of completion has been granted.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 895.
Issuance of order by Commissioner.

If the Commissioner finds a violation of the rules adopted under section 891 of this title or that the structure is not in substantial compliance with the safety requirements of the Department for that structure, the Commissioner may issue an order directing the owner of the premises in which the violation is found, or the owner’s agent and the person doing the work, to correct or remove the violation, withdraw validation of the work notice, or order the owner, any public utility, or any private party furnishing electricity to such installation to not connect or disconnect electrical energy from all or any portion of the electrical system until the cited violation is removed or corrected.
The Commissioner may order any one or a combination of these options in order to effect compliance.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 896.
Request for reconsideration; appeals.

A person aggrieved by a refusal to grant a certificate of completion under section 893 of this title or by an order under section 895 of this title may request that the Commissioner reconsider such refusal or order.
A request for reconsideration shall be made in writing and shall be filed with the Commissioner within 15 days after receipt of written notice of such refusal or order.
The Commissioner shall review the refusal or order within 30 days of the date the request for reconsideration is received.
The Commissioner shall issue an order amending, modifying, or affirming the prior refusal or order as circumstances require within 30 days of the date of the review.
A person aggrieved by the Commissioner’s decision under this section may appeal to the Superior Court, which shall hear the matter de novo.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 897.
Administrative penalties; enforcement; liability.

The Commissioner may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, assess an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation against a person who violates any rule adopted under this subchapter, or any order lawfully issued under this subchapter. Penalties assessed under this section shall be based on the severity of the violation according to rules adopted by the Commissioner.

The Superior Court for the county in which occurs a violation of any rule adopted or any order lawfully issued under this subchapter, on application by the Commissioner shall have jurisdiction to issue an order enjoining or restraining such violation. However, an election by the Commissioner to proceed under this subsection shall not limit or restrict the Commissioner’s authority to assess an administrative penalty under subsection (a) of this section.

Violation of any rule adopted under this subchapter shall be prima facie evidence of negligence in any civil action for damage or injury that is the result of the violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 898.
Municipal inspection.

A legislative body may establish inspection procedures and appoint trained and qualified municipal inspectors to conduct electrical inspections. If the Commissioner determines that the inspection procedures and the training and qualifications of the municipal inspectors are sufficient, the Commissioner may assign the Department’s responsibility for conducting inspections of electrical installations regulated by the Board within that municipality to the municipality. An assignment of responsibility under this section shall not affect the authority of the Commissioner under this subchapter. If the Commissioner assigns responsibility for municipal inspections under this section, the Commissioner may exempt all electrical installations within the municipality from inspection by the State under section 893 of this title. The legislative body may establish reasonable fees for inspections for the purpose of defraying the cost of the same. Such fees will be in lieu of fees established under subsection 893(a) of this title.

Work notices, certificates of completion, and energizing permits shall be issued by municipal inspectors in the same manner and subject to the same conditions that they are issued by the State electrical inspectors under sections 893 and 894 of this title.

A municipal inspector shall have authority to enter any premises in which an electrical installation subject to rules adopted under section 891 of this title is being installed, replaced, or repaired for the purpose of making such inspection as is necessary to carry out his or her responsibilities under this subchapter.

If, after inspection of the electrical installation, a violation of the rules of the Board is found, a municipal inspector may:
(d) (1) If, after inspection of the electrical installation, a violation of the rules of the Board is found, a municipal inspector may:

issue an order directing the electrician of record or the owner of the premises in which the violation is found, to correct or remove the violation;

withdraw validation of the work notice; or

order the owner, any public utility, or any private party furnishing electricity to such installation to disconnect electrical energy from all or any portion of the electrical system until the violation is removed or corrected.

A municipal inspector may order any one or combination of these options set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, as necessary to effect compliance with the Board’s rules.

Acceptance of an assignment of responsibility under this section shall not preclude a municipality from conducting its own electrical inspection program.

A person aggrieved by a refusal of a municipal inspector to issue a certificate of completion or by any other action of a municipal inspector or the municipality relating to this section may appeal to the Commissioner by filing a written application for a hearing with the Commissioner within 15 calendar days after written notice of such refusal or action. A person filing an application in accordance with this subsection shall be entitled to notice and an opportunity for a hearing before the Commissioner within 45 calendar days. Within 30 calendar days after the hearing, the Commissioner shall issue an order amending, modifying, or affirming the action by the municipal inspector or municipality.

The results of all inspections conducted by municipal inspectors under this section shall be reported monthly to the Commissioner. Reports shall include the date of inspections, locations of the work inspected, the name and license number of the contractor performing the work, violations found, orders issued, and the date of any completion certificates or energizing permits issued.

Municipal inspectors shall participate in training provided by the Department of Public Safety. The Department shall also provide continuing consultation, review, and assistance as may be necessary to municipal inspectors.

The Commissioner may revoke an assignment of responsibility to a municipality granted under this section if the Commissioner determines that the training or qualifications of the municipal inspectors or the inspection procedures adopted by the legislative body are insufficient.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 10b, eff. April 1, 2005;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 273.

§ 899.
Private inspections.

Upon a determination that the resources of the State and the municipality are insufficient to provide the approval or inspection services required by this chapter, the Commissioner may assign responsibility for inspecting electrical installations on its own premises to a private corporation, partnership, or sole proprietorship that has an ongoing need for services. Applications to conduct private inspections under this section shall be in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may grant an application under this section if he or she determines that the applicant has the ability to carry out inspections. The Commissioner shall consider at least the following factors:

the size of the facility;

self-insurance or other indication of incentive and motivation for safety;

whether the applicant’s training program for inspectors and inspection procedures are at least equivalent to the State’s program and procedures.

A person authorized to perform private inspections under this section shall:

participate in State-sponsored training programs;

file monthly reports with the Commissioner containing the number and type of inspections, electrical installations, violations for that month, and the license numbers of the electrical contractors performing work;

permit electrical inspectors to perform random inspections of the applicant’s facility;

pay the Department an annual flat fee. The amount of the fee shall be negotiated by the Department and the applicant and shall take into consideration the cost to the applicant of conducting private inspections. The fee shall not exceed the fee established under section 893 of this title.

The Commissioner may revoke an approval to conduct private inspections whenever the Commissioner determines that the training program is insufficient or that the business has failed to comply with the provisions of subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.